North Dakota statutes. TITLE 18 Fires
CHAPTER 18-05.1 Firefighters Death Benefits

18-05.1-01.
Payments to deceased firefighter’s survivor.

The firefighters death benefit fund is a special fund in the state treasury. The revenue provided in section 26.1-03-17 must be deposited in the fund and is appropriated on a continuing basis to the insurance commissioner for disbursement as provided in this chapter. The insurance commissioner shall administer the fund.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 206, § 1; 2009, ch. 15, § 12.

18-05.1-02.
Payments from firefighters death benefit fund.

The insurance commissioner shall pay ten thousand dollars to a deceased firefighter’s survivor upon receipt of a request for payment and evidence of a line of duty death from the fire chief or the fire chief’s designee of a city fire department, rural fire department, or rural fire protection district.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 206, § 1; 2009, ch. 15, § 13.

18-05.1-03.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

“Firefighter” means an individual who is a member of a paid or volunteer fire department that is a part of or is administered by this state, any political subdivision of this state, or a rural fire protection district.

“Line of duty death” means a death that was due to an injury sustained while performing firefighter duties if the death occurred within forty-eight hours of participating in an emergency response or training event. Death from a heart attack or stroke is deemed to be a line of duty death if it occurs within forty-eight hours of an emergency response or training event.

“Survivor” means the spouse of a deceased firefighter who died in the line of duty. If there is no spouse, the term means the individual designated in writing by the deceased firefighter as beneficiary of the Public Safety Officers’ Benefit Act [42 U.S.C. 3796 et seq.] death benefit, or if no beneficiary is designated, the deceased firefighter’s estate.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 206, § 1; 2009, ch. 15, § 14.